en: Bouncy ball surface finish: Glitter; Glossy; Marbled or swirl; Matte; Metallic; Smooth; Speckled or confetti; Spiky or nubby; Textured; Translucent; Transparent; Other
ro-RO: Finisajul suprafeței mingii elastice: Sclipici; Lucios; Marmorat sau cu volute; Mat; Metalic; Neted; Pestriț sau cu confetti; Cu țepi sau noduli; Texturat; Translucid; Transparent; Altele
pt-BR: Acabamento da superfície da bola saltitante: Glitter; Brilhante; Marmorizado ou espiralado; Fosco; Metálico; Liso; Salpicado ou confete; Com pontas ou saliências; Texturizado; Translúcido; Transparente; Outros
nb: Overflatefinish på sprettball: Glitter; Blank; Marmorert eller virvlet; Matt; Metallisk; Glatt; Spettet eller konfetti; Pigg- eller nuppeformet; Teksturert; Halvgjennomsiktig; Gjennomsiktig; Annet
ru: Отделка поверхности попрыгунчика: С блёстками; Глянцевая; Мраморная или с разводами; Матовая; Металлик; Гладкая; В крапинку или конфетти; С шипами или пупырышками; Текстурированная; Полупрозрачная; Прозрачная; Другое
cs: Povrchová úprava hopíku: Třpytivý; Lesklý; Mramorovaný nebo vířivý; Matný; Metalický; Hladký; Strakatý nebo konfetový; Ostnatý nebo výstupkový; Strukturovaný; Průsvitný; Průhledný; Jiné
bg-BG: Повърхностно покритие на подскачащата топка: Брокатена; Гланцова; Мраморна или спирална; Матова; Метална; Гладка; На петна или конфети; С шипчета или пъпчици; Текстурирана; Полупрозрачна; Прозрачна; Друго
it: Finitura della superficie della pallina rimbalzante: Glitterata; Lucida; Marmorizzata o vortice; Opaca; Metallizzata; Liscia; Macchiettata o coriandoli; Con spuntoni o noduli; Testurizzata; Traslucida; Trasparente; Altro
zh-CN: 弹力球表面处理: 闪光; 光泽; 大理石纹或漩涡纹; 哑光; 金属质感; 光滑; 斑点或五彩碎屑; 带刺或颗粒; 带纹理; 半透明; 透明; 其他
sv: Yta på studsboll: Glitter; Blank; Marmorerad eller virvlande; Matt; Metallisk; Slät; Spräcklig eller konfetti; Taggig eller knottrig; Strukturerad; Halvgenomskinlig; Transparent; Annan
tr: Zıplayan top yüzey kaplaması: Simli; Parlak; Mermer desenli veya sarmal; Mat; Metalik; Pürüzsüz; Benekli veya konfetili; Dikenli veya pütürlü; Dokulu; Yarı saydam; Şeffaf; Diğer
vi: Lớp hoàn thiện bề mặt của bóng nảy: Lấp lánh; Bóng bẩy; Vân đá hoặc lượn sóng; Nhám; Kim loại; Nhẵn; Đốm hoặc ánh xà cừ; Gai hoặc núm; Có vân; Bán trong suốt; Trong suốt; Khác
zh-TW: 彈力球表面處理: 亮片; 亮面; 大理石紋或螺旋紋; 霧面; 金屬感; 光滑; 斑點或五彩碎紙; 尖刺或顆粒; 紋理; 半透明; 全透明; 其他
pt-PT: Acabamento da superfície da bola saltitante: Purpurina; Brilhante; Marmoreado ou espiral; Mate; Metálico; Suave; Salpicado ou confetes; Com espinhos ou saliências; Texturizado; Translúcido; Transparente; Outro
ja: 弾むボール表面仕上げ: グリッター; 光沢; マーブルまたはスワール; マット; メタリック; スムーズ; 斑点または紙吹雪; トゲトゲまたはイボイボ; テクスチャ加工; 半透明; 透明; その他
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava odbojne žogice: Bleščice; Sijaj; Marmorirano ali vrtinčasto; Mat; Kovinsko; Gladko; Pikasto ali konfeti; Koničasto ali vozličasto; Teksturirano; Prosojno; Prozorno; Drugo
da: Hoppeboldens overfladefinish: Glimmer; Blank; Marmoreret eller hvirvlet; Mat; Metallisk; Glat; Plettet eller konfetti; Pigget eller nopret; Tekstureret; Halvgennemsigtig; Gennemsigtig; Andet
lt-LT: Šokinėjančio kamuoliuko paviršiaus apdaila: Su blizgučiais; Blizgus; Marmurinis arba sūkurio rašto; Matinis; Metalizuotas; Lygus; Taškuotas arba su konfeti; Spygliuotas arba gruoblėtas; Tekstūrinis; Pusiau skaidrus; Skaidrus; Kita
hu: Pattogó labda felülete: Csillámos; Fényes; Márványos vagy örvényes; Matt; Fémes; Sima; Pöttyös vagy konfettis; Tüskés vagy rücskös; Texturált; Áttetsző; Átlátszó; Egyéb
fr: Finition de la surface d'une balle rebondissante: Paillettes; Brillant; Marbré ou tourbillonnant; Mat; Métallique; Lisse; Tacheté ou confettis; À pointes ou à picots; Texturé; Translucide; Transparent; Autre
fi: Pomppupallon pinnan viimeistely: Hile; Kiiltävä; Marmoroitu tai pyörteinen; Matta; Metallinen; Sileä; Pilkullinen tai konfetti; Piikikäs tai nystyräinen; Teksturoitu; Puoliläpinäkyvä; Läpinäkyvä; Muu
es: Acabado de la superficie de las pelotas saltarinas: Con brillantina; Brillante; Marmoleado o arremolinado; Mate; Metálico; Liso; Moteado o confeti; Con picos o protuberancias; Texturizado; Translúcido; Transparente; Otro
el: Φινίρισμα επιφάνειας μπάλας αναπήδησης: Με γκλίτερ; Γυαλιστερό; Μαρμάρινο ή με νερά; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Λείο; Με κηλίδες ή κομφετί; Με καρφιά ή προεξοχές; Με υφή; Ημιδιαφανές; Διαφανές; Άλλο
pl: Wykończenie powierzchni piłki do skakania: Brokatowe; Błyszczące; Marmurkowe lub z efektem swirl; Matowe; Metaliczne; Gładkie; W kropki lub konfetti; Z kolcami lub wypustkami; Teksturowane; Półprzezroczyste; Przezroczyste; Inne
hr-HR: Završna obrada površine loptice skočice: Šljokice; Sjajno; Mramorirano ili kovitlaci; Matirano; Metalik; Glatko; S mrljama ili konfetima; Šiljasto ili s kvržicama; Teksturirano; Poluprozirno; Prozirno; Ostalo
nl: Oppervlakafwerking stuiterbal: Glitter; Glanzend; Gemarmerd of met een werveling; Mat; Metallic; Glad; Gespikkeld of confetti; Met stekels of nopjes; Getextureerd; Doorschijnend; Transparant; Overige
th: ลักษณะพื้นผิวของลูกบอลเด้ง: กลิตเตอร์; เงางาม; ลายหินอ่อนหรือลายหมุน; ด้าน; เมทัลลิก; เรียบ; จุดหรือคอนเฟตติ; หนามหรือตุ่ม; มีพื้นผิว; โปร่งแสง; โปร่งใส; อื่นๆ
ko: 탱탱볼 표면 마감: 글리터; 유광; 마블링 또는 소용돌이; 무광; 메탈릭; 매끄러움; 반점 또는 색종이 조각; 가시형 또는 돌기형; 질감 처리됨; 반투명; 투명; 기타
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava skákacej lopty: S trblietkami; Lesklý; Mramorovaný alebo vírovitý; Matný; Metalický; Hladký; Fŕkaný alebo s konfetami; S hrotmi alebo hrbolčekmi; Štruktúrovaný; Priesvitný; Priehľadný; Iný
de: Flummi-Oberflächenbeschaffenheit: Glitzer; Glänzend; Marmoriert oder gewirbelt; Matt; Metallic; Glatt; Gesprenkelt oder Konfetti; Stachelig oder genoppt; Texturiert; Transluzent; Transparent; Sonstige